Hawaii statutes.
[§226-109] Climate change adaptation
priority guidelines. Priority guidelines to prepare the State to address
the impacts of climate change, including impacts to the areas of agriculture;
conservation lands; coastal and nearshore marine areas; natural and cultural
resources; education; energy; higher education; health; historic preservation;
water resources; the built environment, such as housing, recreation,
transportation; and the economy shall:

(1) Ensure that Hawaii's people are educated,
informed, and aware of the impacts climate change may have on their
communities;

(2) Encourage community stewardship groups and local
stakeholders to participate in planning and implementation of climate change
policies;

(3) Invest in continued monitoring and research of
Hawaii's climate and the impacts of climate change on the State;

(4) Consider native Hawaiian traditional knowledge
and practices in planning for the impacts of climate change;

(5) Encourage the preservation and restoration of
natural landscape features, such as coral reefs, beaches and dunes, forests,
streams, floodplains, and wetlands, that have the inherent capacity to avoid,
minimize, or mitigate the impacts of climate change;

(6) Explore adaptation strategies that moderate harm
or exploit beneficial opportunities in response to actual or expected climate
change impacts to the natural and built environments;

(7) Promote sector resilience in areas such as water,
roads, airports, and public health, by encouraging the identification of
climate change threats, assessment of potential consequences, and evaluation of
adaptation options;

(8) Foster cross-jurisdictional collaboration between
county, state, and federal agencies and partnerships between government and
private entities and other nongovernmental entities, including nonprofit
entities;

(9) Use management and implementation approaches that
encourage the continual collection, evaluation, and integration of new
information and strategies into new and existing practices, policies, and
plans; and

(10) Encourage planning and management of the natural
and built environments that effectively integrate climate change policy. [L
2012, c 286, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next